Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.36.021

Assault in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of assault in the second degree if he or she, under circumstances not amounting to assault in the first degree:

(a) Intentionally assaults another and thereby recklessly inflicts substantial bodily harm; or

(b) Intentionally and unlawfully causes substantial bodily harm to an unborn quick child by intentionally and unlawfully inflicting any injury upon the mother of such child; or

(c) Assaults another with a deadly weapon; or

(d) With intent to inflict bodily harm, administers to or causes to be taken by another, poison or any other destructive or noxious substance; or

(e) With intent to commit a felony, assaults another; or

(f) Knowingly inflicts bodily harm which by design causes such pain or agony as to be the equivalent of that produced by torture; or

(g) Assaults another by strangulation or suffocation.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, assault in the second degree is a class B felony.

(b) Assault in the second degree with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135 is a class A felony.

[ 2011 c 166 s 1; 2007 c 79 s 2; 2003 c 53 s 64; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 355; 1997 c 196 s 2. Prior: 1988 c 266 s 2; 1988 c 206 s 916; 1988 c 158 s 2; 1987 c 324 s 2; 1986 c 257 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—2007 c 79: "The legislature finds that assault by strangulation may result in immobilization of a victim, may cause a loss of consciousness, injury, or even death, and has been a factor in a significant number of domestic violence related assaults and fatalities. While not limited to acts of assault against an intimate partner, assault by strangulation is often knowingly inflicted upon an intimate partner with the intent to commit physical injury, or substantial or great bodily harm. Strangulation is one of the most lethal forms of domestic violence. The particular cruelty of this offense and its potential effects upon a victim both physically and psychologically, merit its categorization as a ranked felony offense under chapter 9A.36 RCW." [ 2007 c 79 s 1.]

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—1988 c 266: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1988." [ 1988 c 266 s 3.]

Effective date—1988 c 206 ss 916, 917: "Sections 916 and 917 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1988." [ 1988 c 206 s 922.]

Effective date—1988 c 158: See note following RCW 9A.04.110.

Effective date—1987 c 324: See note following RCW 9A.04.110.

Severability—1986 c 257: See note following RCW 9A.56.010.

Effective date—1986 c 257 ss 3-10: See note following RCW 9A.04.110.